Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3147.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6066XC (4) 91 lh/ns S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 602.1401, subsections 1 and 5, Code 2026, 1 are amended to read as follows: 2 1. The supreme court shall establish, and may amend, a 3 personnel system and a pay and benefits plan for judicial 4 officers, the state court administrator, and court employees. 5 The personnel system shall include a designation by position 6 title, classification, and function of each position or class 7 of positions within the judicial branch. Reasonable efforts 8 shall be made to accommodate the individual staffing and 9 management practices of the respective clerks of the district 10 court. The personnel system, in the employment of court 11 employees, shall not discriminate on the basis of race, creed, 12 color, sex, national origin, religion, physical disability, or 13 political party preference. The supreme court, in establishing 14 the personnel system, shall implement the comparable worth 15 directives issued by the state court administrator under 16 section 602.1204, subsection 2 . The personnel system 17 shall include the prohibitions against sexual harassment of 18 full-time, part-time, and temporary employees set out in 19 section 19B.12 , and shall include a grievance procedure for 20 discriminatory harassment. The personnel system shall develop 21 and distribute at the time of hiring or orientation, a guide 22 that describes for employees the applicable sexual harassment 23 prohibitions and grievance, violation, and disposition 24 procedures. This subsection does not supersede the remedies 25 provided under chapter 216 . 26 5. The pay and benefits plan shall set the compensation and 27 benefits of judicial officers, the state court administrator, 28 and court employees within the funds appropriated by the 29 general assembly. 30 Sec. 2. Section 602.1502, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 31 amended by striking the subsection. 32 Sec. 3. Section 602.9104, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 33 2026, is amended to read as follows: 34 a. A judge to whom this article applies shall be paid an 35 -1- LSB 6066XC (4) 91 lh/ns 1/ 3 S.F. _____ amount equal to the basic salary of the judge as set by the 1 general assembly pursuant to section 602.1401 reduced by an 2 amount designated as the judgeâs required contribution to the 3 judicial retirement fund. The amount designated as the judgeâs 4 required contribution shall be paid by the state in the manner 5 provided in subsection 2 . 6 Sec. 4. Section 602.9204, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 7 2026, is amended to read as follows: 8 a. A judge who retires on or after July 1, 1994, and who 9 is appointed a senior judge under section 602.9203 shall be 10 paid a salary as determined by the general assembly pursuant to 11 section 602.1401 . 12 Sec. 5. REPEAL. Section 602.1501, Code 2026, is repealed. 13 Sec. 6. JUDICIAL OFFICERS ââ CURRENT SALARY RATES 14 SUPERSEDED. For purposes of 2025 Iowa Acts, chapter 158, 15 section 6, subsection 1, this Act shall be deemed as the 16 provision of salary rates for judicial officers by the general 17 assembly for fiscal years subsequent to the fiscal year 18 beginning July 1, 2025. 19 Sec. 7. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act takes effect June 19, 20 2026. 21